Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.252, is amended to read: 241.252 FREE COMMUNICATION SERVICES FOR deleted text begin INCARCERATEDdeleted text end new text begin CONFINEDnew text end PERSONS. Subdivision 1. Free communication services. (a) A deleted text begin state adult or juveniledeleted text end facility deleted text begin under the control of the commissioner of correctionsdeleted text end must provide deleted text begin incarcerateddeleted text end new text begin confinednew text end persons with voice communication services. A facility may supplement voice communication services with other communication services, including but not limited to video communication and email or electronic messaging services. A facility must at least continue to offer the services the facility offered as of January 1, 2023. (b) To the extent that voice new text begin or other new text end communication services are provided, which must not be limited beyond program participation and routine facility policies and procedures, neither the individual initiating the communication nor the individual receiving the communication must be charged for the service. Subd. 2. deleted text begin Voicedeleted text end Communication services restrictions. Nothing in this section allows deleted text begin an incarcerateddeleted text end new text begin a confinednew text end person to violate an active protection order, harassment restraining order, or other no-contact order or directive. Subd. 3. deleted text begin Statedeleted text end Revenue prohibited. deleted text begin A statedeleted text end new text begin Annew text end agency new text begin operating a facility new text end must not receive revenue from the provision of voice communication services or any other communication services under this sectiondeleted text begin , but an agency may collect commissions on communication services provided under any contract entered into before January 1, 2023deleted text end . Subd. 4. Visitation programs. (a) Facilities shall maintain in-person visits for deleted text begin incarcerateddeleted text end new text begin confinednew text end personsdeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end Communication servicesnew text begin , including video calls,new text end must not be used to replace a facility's in-person visitation programnew text begin or be counted toward a confined person's in-person visitation limitnew text end . (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the deleted text begin commissionerdeleted text end new text begin agency operating the facilitynew text end may waive the in-person visitation program requirement under this subdivision if there is: (1) a declared emergency under section 12.31; or (2) a local-, state-, or federal-declared natural disaster. Subd. 5. Reporting. new text begin (a) new text end The Department of Corrections must include the following information covering the previous calendar year in its annual performance report required under section 241.016: (1) deleted text begin itsdeleted text end new text begin the status of all the agency's communication contracts;new text end efforts to renegotiate the agency's communication contracts, including the rates the agency is paying or charging deleted text begin incarcerateddeleted text end new text begin confinednew text end people or community members for any and all services in the contracts;new text begin and plans to consolidate the agency's communication contracts to maximize purchasing power;new text end (2) a complete and detailed accounting of how deleted text begin legislativelydeleted text end appropriated funds for communication services are spent, including spending on expenses previously covered by commissions; and (3) new text begin summarynew text end data on usage of all communication services, including monthly call and message volume. new text begin (b) By January 15 of each year, an agency other than the Department of Corrections that operates a facility must report the information described in paragraph (a) to the commissioner of corrections. By March 15 of each year, the commissioner shall submit a summary of the information submitted under this paragraph to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over corrections and human services policy and finance. new text end Subd. 6. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: (1) "voice communications" means real-time, audio-only communication services, namely phone calls made over wireline telephony, voice over Internet protocol, or any other technology infrastructure; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) "other communication services" means communication services other than voice communications, including but not limited to video calls and electronic messagesnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) "facility" means a state adult or juvenile correctional facility under the control of the commissioner of corrections, or any facility, setting, or program owned, operated, or under the programmatic or fiscal control of the commissioner of human services or the Direct Care and Treatment executive boardnew text end . Sec. 2. new text begin [246.0142] FREE COMMUNICATION SERVICES FOR PATIENTS AND CLIENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Free communication services. new text end new text begin The commissioner of human services and the Direct Care and Treatment executive board and all facilities, settings, and programs owned, operated, or under the programmatic or fiscal control of the commissioner of human services or the Direct Care and Treatment executive board are subject to section 241.252. The commissioner and executive board must not include the cost of voice or other communication services in the cost of care as defined under section 246.50 or 246B.01. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Communication service restrictions. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 241.252, subdivisions 2 and 4, nothing in this section entitles a civilly committed person to communication services restricted or limited under section 253B.03, subdivision 3, or 253D.19. new text end